hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Csónakázó és vízisport-ruházat: Öltöző- és szárazköpenyek; Szárazruha-kiegészítők; Szárazruhák; Mentőmellény-kiegészítők; Mentőmellények; Kiütésvédők és úszópólók; Vízlepergető felsők; Vízi cipők; Búvárruhadarabok; Búvárruhák
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Echipamente pentru plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice: Halate de schimb și uscate; Accesorii pentru costume uscate de scufundări; Combinezoane impermeabile; Accesorii pentru veste de salvare; Veste de salvare; Bluze de protecție și tricouri pentru înot; Jachete de protecție contra stropilor; Pantofi de apă; Piese combinezoane din neopren; Combinezoane din neopren
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Oblečení na lodě a vodní sporty: Převlékací a sušicí župany; Příslušenství k suchým oblekům; Suché obleky; Záchranné vesty – příslušenství; Záchranné vesty; Funkční oblečení na vodní sporty; Vodácké bundy; Boty do vody; Neoprenové díly; Neoprenové obleky
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 의류: 체인징 및 드라이 로브; 드라이슈트 액세서리; 건식 잠수복; 구명 조끼 부대용품; 구명조끼; 래시가드/수영 셔츠; 스프레이 탑; 워터슈즈; 잠수복; 습식 잠수복
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Attrezzatura per sport acquatici: Accappatoi e poncho asciugamani da surf; Accessori per mute stagne; Mute stagne; Accessori per giubbotti salvataggio; Giubbotti di salvataggio; Magliette da nuoto e antiabrasione; Top paraspruzzi; Scarpe da scoglio; Componenti di mute subacquee; Mute
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Equipamiento para deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva: Batas de cambio y secado; Accesorios para trajes secos; Trajes de buceo; Accesorios para chalecos salvavidas; Chalecos salvavidas; Camisetas de protección y natación; Chaquetas impermeables cortavientos; Zapatillas para el agua; Partes de trajes de neopreno; Trajes de neopreno
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Odzież żeglarska i do uprawiania sportów wodnych: Poncza do przebierania i szlafroki wodoodporne; Akcesoria do suchych skafandrów; Suche skafandry; Akcesoria do kamizelek ratunkowych; Kamizelki ratunkowe; Odzież ochronna do pływania; Sztormiaki; Buty do wody; Pianki w częściach; Stroje piankowe
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > เสื้อผ้าสำหรับกีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ: เสื้อคลุมเปลี่ยนเสื้อผ้าและซับน้ำ; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับดรายสูท; ชุดดรายสูท; อุปกรณ์เสื้อชูชีพ; เสื้อชูชีพ; แรชการ์ดและเสื้อใส่ว่ายน้ำ; เสื้อกันละอองน้ำ; รองเท้าลุยน้ำ; เว็ทสูท; ชุดเว็ทสูท
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Roupas de canoagem e esportes aquáticos: Roupões de troca e toalhas poncho; Acessórios para roupas secas; Roupa para mergulho; Acessórios para coletes salva-vidas; Coletes salva-vidas; Roupa para surfe ou mergulho; Jaquetas impermeáveis (Spray Tops); Sapatos aquáticos; Roupas de mergulho; Roupas para mergulho
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Облекло за плаване с лодка и водни спортове: Халати за преобличане и подсушаване; Аксесоари за сухи костюми; Сухи костюми; Аксесоари за спасителни жилетки; Спасителни жилетки; Дрехи с UV защита и блузи за плуване; Водозащитни горнища против пръски; Водни обувки; Части от неопренов костюм; Неопренови костюми
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Boating & Water Sport Apparel: Changing & Dry Robes; Drysuit Accessories; Drysuits; Life Jacket Accessories; Life Jackets; Rash Guards & Swim Shirts; Spray Tops; Water Shoes; Wetsuit Pieces; Wetsuits
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 划船/水上运动服饰: 换衣袍与速干袍; 干式潜水服配件; 干式潜水衣; 救生衣配件; 救生衣; 冲浪服; 防浪上衣; 涉水鞋; 潜水服; 湿式潜水衣
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Oblačila za plovbo in vodne športe: Ogrinjala za preoblačenje in parke; Dodatki za potapljaško obleko; Vodoodporna obleka; Dodatki za rešilne jopiče; Rešilni jopiči; Zaščitne majice in plavalne majice; Zaščitni zgornji deli proti pršenju; Vodni čevlji; Deli neoprenske obleke; Neoprenske obleke
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Boots- & Wassersportkleidung: Umzieh- & Trockenmäntel; Zubehör für Trockentauchanzüge; Trockenanzüge; Schwimmwestenzubehör; Rettungswesten; Rashguards & Schwimmshirts; Spraytops; Wasserschuhe; Neoprenanzugteile; Neoprenanzüge
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Équipement de plaisance et sports nautiques: Ponchos de change et peignoirs; Accessoires de combinaisons étanches; Combinaisons étanches; Accessoires pour gilets de sauvetage; Gilets de sauvetage; Vêtements anti-irritations et de baignade; Vareuses; Chaussures d’eau; Éléments de combinaisons de plongée; Combinaisons de sports nautiques
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 水上運動服裝: 換衣斗篷與防風保暖外套; 乾式潛水衣配件; 乾式防寒潛水衣; 救生衣配件; 救生衣; 防曬泳衣; 防飛沫上衣; 涉水鞋; 潛水衣; 濕式潛水衣
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Trang phục chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước: Áo choàng thay đồ và làm khô; Phụ kiện bộ đồ lặn khô; Áo lặn chống nước; Phụ kiện áo cứu hộ; Áo phao cứu hộ; Áo bơi; Áo khoác chống nước; Giày lội nước; Trang phục dưới nước; Đồ lặn ướt
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Экипировка для гребли и водных видов спорта: Пончо и халаты для переодевания; Аксессуары для сухих гидрокостюмов; Сухие гидрокостюмы; Аксессуары для спасательных жилетов; Спасательные жилеты; Рашгарды и гидромайки; Спрейтопы; Аквашузы; Отдельные элементы гидрокостюма; Гидрокостюмы
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Ενδύματα για ναυσιπλοΐα και θαλάσσια σπορ: Ρόμπες αλλαγής και στεγνώματος; Αξεσουάρ στεγανών στολών; Στεγανές στολές; Αξεσουάρ για σωσίβια; Σωσίβια; Rash Guards & μπλούζες Swim Shirts; Αδιάβροχα τζάκετ θαλάσσης; Παπούτσια θαλάσσης; Εξαρτήματα στολής κατάδυσης; Στολές κατάδυσης
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Odjeća za plovidbu i vodene sportove: Ogrtači za presvlačenje i sušenje; Dodaci za suho odijelo; Kombinezoni za plovidbu; Pribor za prsluke za spašavanje; Prsluci za spašavanje; Zaštitne majice i majice za plivanje; Gornji dijelovi odjeće protiv prskanja; Cipele za vodu; Dijelovi ronilačkog odijela; Ronilačko odijelo
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Veneily- ja vesiurheiluvaatetus: Pyyheviitat ja kuivattelutakit; Kuivapukujen lisävarusteet; Kuivapuvut; Pelastusliivien lisätarvikkeet; Pelastusliivit; Suoja- ja uintipaidat; Roisketakit; Vesikengät; Märkäpuvun osat; Märkäpuvut
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Kläder för båt- och vattensporter: Ombytes- och badrockar; Tillbehör för torrdräkter; Torrdräkter; Tillbehör till flytvästar; Flytvästar; Utslagsskydd och simtröjor; Spraytops; Badskor; Våtdräktsdelar; Våtdräkter
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Vestuário para desportos náuticos e aquáticos: Roupões para mudar de roupa e secar; Acessórios para fatos secos; Fatos de mergulho estanques; Acessórios de coletes salva-vidas; Coletes salva-vidas; Proteções e camisolas de mergulho; Camisolas impermeáveis; Calçado de água; Combinações de mergulho; Fatos de mergulho
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Oblečenie na člnkovanie a vodné športy: Prezliekacie župany; Príslušenstvo k suchej potápačskej kombinéze; Neoprénové kombinézy; Príslušenstvo pre záchranné vesty; Záchranné vesty; Funkčné oblečenie a tričká do vody; Vodeodolné vrchné diely; Vodné topánky; Časti neoprénovej kombinézy; Neoprény
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > ウォータースポーツウェア: お着替えポンチョ・ドライローブ; ドライスーツアクセサリー; ドライスーツ; ライフジャケット関連用品; ライフジャケット; ラッシュガード; スプレートップ; マリンシューズ; ウェットスーツ（部位別）; ウェットスーツ
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Apranga plaukimui valtimis ir vandens sportui: Persirengimo ir džiovinimosi chalatai; Sausųjų hidrokostiumų priedai; Sausojo tipo hidrokostiumai; Gelbėjimosi liemenių priedai; Gelbėjimosi liemenės; Marškinėliai nuo saulės ir maudymosi marškinėliai; Apsauginiai viršutiniai drabužiai nuo purslų; Vandens batai; Šlapiojo tipo hidrokostiumų dalys; Šlapiojo tipo hidrokostiumai
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Sejlertøj og tøj til vandsport: Skifte- og tørrekåber; Tilbehør til tørdragter; Tørdragter; Redningsveste – tilbehør; Redningsveste; Svømmetrøjer; Spraytops; Badesko; Våddragtdele; Våddragter
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Båt- og vannsportklær: Skifte- og tørrekåper; Tilbehør til tørrdrakt; Tørrdrakter; Tilbehør til redningsvester; Redningsvester; Rashguarder og svømmeskjorter; Spruttopper; Badesko; Våtdraktdeler; Våtdrakter
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları Kıyafetleri: Giyinme ve kurulanma pançoları; Kuru dalış elbisesi aksesuarları; Su Geçirmez Elbiseler; Can Yeleği Aksesuarları; Can Yelekleri; Kızarıklık Koruyucu Giysiler ve Yüzme Giysileri; Su geçirmez rüzgarlıklar; Deniz ayakkabıları; Wetsuit Parçaları; Dalgıç Kıyafetleri
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Boot- en watersportkleding: Omkleedponcho's en badjassen; Accessoires voor droogpakken; Drysuits; Accessoires voor reddingsvesten; Reddingsvesten; Rashguards en zwemshirts; Spraytops; Waterschoenen; Delen van wetsuits; Wetsuits